yi.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY ־אבגדהווזחטיכלמםנןסעפףצץקרשתײ׳״

REP 18
REP װ וו
REP ױ וי
REP ײ יי
REP ײַ יי
REP ' ׳
REP '' ״
REP " ״
REP א אַ
REP א אָ
REP בּ ב
REP בֿ ב
REP וּ ו
REP יִ י
REP כּ כ
REP פ פּ
REP פֿ פ
REP שׂ ש
REP תּ ת
REP אי יי
REP אַ אָ
REP אָ אַ


PFX 1 Y 1
PFX 1 0 אָנ .

PFX 2 Y 1
PFX 2 0 אויס .

PFX 3 Y 1
PFX 3 0 איינ .

PFX 4 Y 1
PFX 4 0 אַרויס .

PFX 5 Y 1
PFX 5 0 אַריבער .

PFX 6 Y 1
PFX 6 0 אַרויפ .

PFX 7 Y 1
PFX 7 0 איבער .

PFX 8 Y 1
PFX 8 0 פאָר .

PFX 9 Y 1
PFX 9 0 אַראָפּ .

PFX A Y 1
PFX A 0 אַריינ .

PFX B Y 1
PFX B 0 באַ .

PFX D Y 1
PFX D 0 דורכ .

PFX O Y 1
PFX O 0 אָפּ .

PFX F Y 1
PFX F 0 פאַר .

PFX U Y 1
PFX U 0 אויפ .

PFX V Y 1
PFX V 0 אַדורכ .

PFX W Y 1
PFX W 0 אַוועק .


SFX S Y 3
SFX S 0 ס ע
SFX S 0 עס ק
SFX S ה ות ה

SFX N Y 1
SFX N 0 ן .

SFX R Y 1
SFX R 0 ער .

SFX E Y 1
SFX E 0 ע .

SFX C Y 2
SFX C 0 ך לע
SFX C 0 עך ל
