yi.dic
אַרומגערינגלט/REN
באָמבאַסטישע/S
ביזאַהעריק/ERN
בלוטיקנדיק/FNER
בעטלערל/C
געברענגט/9EAR2U1N4
געברענט/2ERDNO
געגאַנגענע/WO6D79VU3184A25
געגעבענעם/231A78WO94
געגעסענער/U7231O
געדרייט/WR2N7E31AO4
געדרייטס/14237OAW
געהאַלטענעם/V21U3O
געהויכט/2EN4R
געהענגט/2NO4ER51
געוואַלדיקטס/F
געוואָרפן/OAW98D2734615
געוואָרפענעם/8WA71D2O46539
געוואַשן/7O2U3
געזונגענער/U27O
געטראָטנס/O6AU71425
געטראַכטס/A7D2
געלאָזן/W74O29VDA
געלאָזנס/V2OWA974D
געלאָפענעם/W2UAV719D4
געליגן/W
געלעבטס/V3OU72D
גענומענעם/6AU79D8W1O234V
געפאַלענעם/95AW746DV231O
געפאָרענער/O5D4A9VW1627
געפּישט/2NRE
געציטערט/OERUN4
געקאַפּעט/RE9N
געקאָפּעט/RE3N
געקעמטס/26
געקעמפט/RNE
געקראַכט/9ERAN
געקראָכן/92465DWOA
גערוימטס/U23O
געריגלט/ERN
געריידטס/O7123A9DU4
געריכטן/8
געריסענער/UA239W74D1O
געשוויגנס/O
געשטאָרבענער/W2O
געשיכורטס/1
געשליטלטס/9
גראָבן/3UO21A
דונערנדיקס/4
דענטיסטקע/S
האָדעווען/21U
האַלטונגען/BO
האַקנדיקס/OA27F394
הייקערעלע/C
הענגענדיקס/O21947U65
וואַנדלסטו/F
וויאָנדזלענדיק/NRE
ווינטשעווענדיקס/1O
ווירקט/B
ווירקן/2U3
זינקענדיק/9RFEN3
זיפצנדיקס/O
זיצנדיק/VNR27E3OB
זעענדיקס/214
טוקערקע/S
טיילענדיש/REN
טעלערל/C
טראַנסקריבירט/NRE
טריקן/F
כאַפּעריי/7
לאָזנדיק/2R7N4EFVW96ADO
לייטערס/B
לייענונגען/8
מאָדנע/S
נעמענדיק/WRU6NBD82E731O9AF4
סאָניע/NS
סטריגעווע/FN
עסטישעלע/C
עקדיש/N
פּאַטשנדיק/1RNEF
פאָלגנדיקס/F2
פאַנטאַזירט/NER
פּאַסטע/S
פאַרבלאָנקעט/NER
פלאַקערנדיקס/6U
פליען/WVO461D9A
פעדעמענדיק/3NAERD
פרעגעלע/C
צאָלנדיק/ONEBR
צובייגן/19235
צוגרייטנדיק/NRE
צוטרעטן/71AU452O
צולאָזן/76WD29AVO4
צונויפשטוקעווענדיק/ENR
צושפּאַנען/12345W
צושפּאַרן/7A1D34
צירסט/B
צעקלאַפּ/N
קאַלייענדיקס/F
קאַפּען/9
קוקנדיקס/9D7315FV246BA
קלערנדיק/2E7RBFNUA
קניילעכעלע/C
קניפּן/1
קערנדיקס/2WF71O
רופנדיק/WRUONE4ABF21
ריזיקאַלישע/S
ריכטיקס/U
רעכענונג/92OF
שאַפסט/FB
שוואַרצנדיק/FENR
שטאָלצירט/ENR
שטויסעלע/C
שטופּן/1AW4DVO
שטעלונג/UO27F83B
שיקן/W467O9A
שליסטו/FB
שמוגלענדיק/ANDER4
שפּאַלטנדיק/UNORE
שפּאַצירט/NDRE
שפּאַרנדיקס/734D1AF
שפּיליענדיקס/F3
שרויפנדיק/3OR6NE
אונטערקליידעלע/C
אייל/NW
אַרונטערבייגנדיק/NRE
באָמבאַסטיש/NER
באַרייטן/8
בייגנדיק/3N5R21E9F
בלאָנדזשענדיק/WFNRE
גאַליאָרקע/S
גיינדיקס/VWO461859AB2U73D
גייערס/3AD8
גיסן/2157O46A
גלחעלע/C
גלייכנדיקס/F2
גנבענענדיקס/D469WA
געאַרבעטס/2O476DU
געהאַלטנס/V231OU
געהויבענער/41U
געוואונקענס/91
געזעסענעם/273VO
געטאָפּיעטס/1
געטראָגענעם/1O527WU4AD
געטראָטן/23O65AU741
געכריפּעט/REN
געלאָזטס/OV76A9DW24
געלאַסן/2
געמאַכט/VWER2UN71OD
געמיש/N
געפאַלן/1OA4V2D96W735
געפּאַקט/2N3AER1
געפאָרענע/W165A29V74DO
געפּועלט/2ENR
געפיל/1N8
געפלאָכטענער/3AD7
געפלאַמטס/3U
געפלויגענעם/V49ADW61
געקומען/W4672U15FO9AD8
געקומענס/W5A7OD846F2U91
געקלעטערטס/U56
גערעדט/UR3N1E4D27OA9
געשטאַנענס/712U3O
געשטופּט/VR4E6ANDW1O
געשטיגענער/O5U76
געשטימטס/O3
געשלייכטס/4D
געשפּאַנטס/13W245
געשפּרונגענער/AO4695U
געשראָקענעם/1O7
געשריגענעם/7421A9
גריפן/1B
דאַרפט/B
הייזל/8C
הייסער/NER
העלפנדיק/2E4NRB
וואַרפן/WAF231O4D87965B
וואַרפסטו/BF
וויגל/C
ווישט/F
זומפּיק/ERN
זינגענדיק/2NUE7OBR
טאָן/7OB1FUA2
טאַראַשטשענדיק/2RNE
טינטערעלע/C
טענהנדיקס/23
טעסענדיק/2ENR
טראַכט/BNF
כאַפּעריש/1RNE
כמאַרעט/F
לאַבאָראַטאָריע/S
לייגן/A1O469WU73
לייענונג/8
מאַכנדיק/VERWN2U7F1OD
מענטשל/C
נעמט/BF
סאַודיש/RNE
על/8
עפּישע/S
עקסקלוסיוו/NRE
פאַל/BN8371OD
פאַרפּאַרעט/RNE
פּליכעוואַט/RNE
צוגעטשעפּעט/RNE
צוהאַלטן/UO23V1
צולייגן/712A94W3UO68
צוציען/U6AW2731459
צוקריכן/O5ADW4629
קאָמפּיוטעריזירט/FERN
קאַרבנדיק/3RNE
קוילעטשל/C
קוליק/S
קורד/N
קלינגענדיקס/71F2O
קעגנאיבערדיק/REN
קרוינסט/B
שווינדלענדיקס/VFB
שטאָקיק/3NER
שטאַרצן/4
שטאַרקנדיק/FNER
שטעקסטו/FB
שינדן/O9
שיסן/W9D42
שיקנדיק/7NOER9AW46F
שלאָג/BNF8
שפּאַנענדיקס/1532W4
שרייענדיק/27E4NRAF91
אונטערגעסל/C
אַפּאָקאַליפּטישע/S
אָפּעטדאַנקענדיק/RNE
אַראַמיש/ENR
אַרבעטנדיק/UNO6BE2R7D4
באַלעסטיקנדיק/RNE
בינדנדיק/2UE7ONARF
ברויזנדיקס/U
גאַנג/AD72U46O
גיינדיק/2ERU731N5BDVWO9468A
גלידערנדיקס/3
געבויגענע/923571
געביסענער/23O71AV
געגאַנגענס/4AU3158W6279VOD
געגאַנגענעם/271O5W6U834V9AD
געגאָסנס/471256AO
געדראָלנס/1
געדרונגענער/AD42
געהאַנגענער/2149U567
געוואָרפענע/WO97146583D2A
געזאָגט/1ERON2A4
געזונקען/39
געטראָגן/2O5ADWU741
געטראָגענער/2WU74OD15A
געליטענעם/1
געלעגענער/O6
געסימבאָלעוועטס/A
געפּאַדעט/ENR
געפאַרבטס/72
געפלאַקערטס/U6
געצוואונגענעם/U6
געקוילעט/WR2NOE
געקומענעם/12U946DF75A8WO
געקוקט/4N65DER219AV73
געקלעפּט/NER2U
געקראַכטס/9A
געקראָכנס/46DAOW295
געריסנס/142O39DWU7A
גערעגט/UNER1
געשווינדקייט/N
געשטויגנס/5U367O
געשטעלטס/46792U31OAW8
געשטעפּט/2E7R1ONA
געשלעפּטס/46W7A9
געשניטענע/71423OAD
געשפּרונגען/465AO9U
דערווישט/NER
האַמערן/D
האַקן/4O2379A
היפּען/75
וואוילקלינגעדיק/NER
וואוינענדיק/ORBNE
וויינען/21BF
וויספּע/S
וועסטעלע/C
ווערטער/8
זוימסט/FB
זוכנדיקס/DO4B2UF
טונקענדיקס/3
טיילנדיק/FN23ROEB
לאַזער/N
מאָדליענדיק/RNE
מאַכנדיקס/17VWOD2UF
מייסטערנדיקס/2
משפּטנדיקס/OF
נאָטאַציע/S
נוצנדיק/BN2ER
נעכטיקנדיקס/7
סטריגעווענדיקס/AF76231
עם/831
פאַרמינערט/NRE
פאָרנדיק/VE7R95NAD246FW1O
פאַרשוואַרצט/ENR
פויסטל/C
פּוצטו/BF
פירן/VO9734U5W
פלאַטערדיק/NER
פלאַנצט/F
פּלימעניק/S
פליענדיק/VR194N6DEWA
פרישנדיקס/OU
צוכאַפּן/AO92U74615
צופאָרן/5AV194D2O6W7
צעטענהט/NER
קושנדיק/2RNE
קלעקנדיק/ERN
קרעפטיק/NRE
רייד/2N4
ריידן/9U731ADO
ריידנדיק/3N94R2EU1OAD7
רייט/NB
רעדנדיקס/3F2U7O94D1AB
רעכענען/O92ABF7
שוועבעלע/C
שווענקענדיק/2NORBEF
שטעט/8
שיילנדיק/WRONE2
שיקנדיקס/9746AWFO
שמירנדיקס/21BF
שפּיזנדיקס/VB
שפּיליעט/F
תרעומה/S
אַהיימפאָרנדיק/NRE
אַלטעטשק/ENR
אַרבעטן/U4D72O6
באַגרינדעט/ENR
באַטרעף/1
בונטפאַרביק/NER
בלעטערנדיק/RDUNE
בערעלע/C
ברוכן/2
גייער/3AD48
גנבענענדיק/WERADN946
געבנדיק/2ONR9AFE738W14
געגאָלטנס/O
געגלעקלט/ENR
געגעבן/1OA7924W38
געגעבענע/231947WOA8
געגעבענער/1A7W2398O4
געגראָבענעם/2U1O3A
געהאַנגענס/U7129456
געוועקט/2EU7RN
געטאָנעם/U71A2O
געטענהטס/23
געטריבענע/ADOW74
געלאָזענע/24W7ADOV9
געליטענע/1
געלייגט/WNU1OE6A2R79438
געמאַכטס/UV1DW237O
געפאָרנס/W7196AD2O4V5
געצערט/3EORN
געקאַקטס/O2
געקומענער/2U8WOA179D465F
געקלעטערט/6N5UER
געקראָכענער/W5D4629OA
געשטויגענע/6UO735
געשטיגענעם/6O57U
געשלאָגענע/1D846O2U7
געשלאָגענער/7462UO1D8
געשלונגענער/3A9
געשמיסענעם/OW
געשריבענעם/ADV23W714UO
גראַטע/S
דאַנקענדיק/BERFNO
דאָרש/N
דעקנדיקס/B2U7OF
דרעשנדיקס/2
האַריקענדיקס/1
וואַרפט/BF
וויאָסלעווענדיק/6NER
וויינסט/FB
ווינקענדיקס/19
זאַפּנדיק/3NR1EDA
זייטיקס/3
זינגליד/R
חזרנדיקס/73
טועכצן/U1
כאַלאַטעלע/C
לאָזנדיקס/VAD94W27O6F
לאַרווע/S
לויכטנדיקס/BD
מונקלענדיק/NRE
מיטגעלעבט/RNE
מעסטנדיק/2E1OFNR
ניצנדיקס/2FB
פּאָדקעווע/NS
פּוצט/FB
פייפנדיק/E2R1N
פּלאָנטערנדיק/FE2RUN
פּעקל/C
פּרייגלענדיק/3ENR
צאַפּנדיק/2REN
צוזאָגן/OA142
צושניידן/1234O7AD
צי/65BF
ציען/6B2W9F71O4AU35
צערייבנדיק/NRE
קום/B4U1
קוקנדיק/V7N314R6AEDF29B5
קלאַפּן/O12A
קליענטעלע/S
קריכנדיקס/9465WODF2A
רוקנדיק/1N4R67OAE9F
רעאַקטיוו/N
רעגולירט/3ERN
רעשנדיק/FNER
שטופּנדיקס/W1DO46FVA
שטעלער/8
שטענדיקס/F1B
שיינענדיק/UR94NABEO
שלחל/C
שמייסנדיק/EWNOR
שעפּן/1O2
שרייבנדיקס/1A7FBW4DV2U3O
אַראָמאַטישע/S
אַרומגיינדיק/RNE
ביוסט/N
בלאָזנדיקס/41A2
בעטן/12734A
בעטנדיק/3E14RA27NF
גיין/W2U1746A835VO9D
גייענדיק/UN4RDEF
גליטשנדיק/9E4NDR
גלייכווערטעלע/C
גלייכנדיק/2NFRE
גנבענען/AD946W
געבאַלעוועט/RNE
געבנדיקס/98FA273OW14
געגאָסענע/7O14265A
געוואָרפענער/1O9D7465W283A
געוועפּטס/2
געזאַפּטס/D3A1
געטשוכעטס/2UO
געלאָזט/VN7OR96EAW4D2
געלאַכט/2ONARE
געלייגטס/WU6A8O971423
געסיליעט/UN1ER
געפּאַטשקעטס/1
געפירט/WE2NU71RO5V4AD39
געפלאָכטנס/A37D
געפלויגן/4V19W6AD
געצויגענעם/7192U35A46W
געקאָפּעטס/3
געקלונגענער/7O21
געריסענעם/94WUD71OA23
געשטויגענעם/536U7O
געשטימט/3ERNO
געשניפּטס/9W
געשפּרונגענעם/AUO5946
געשריבנס/2U3ODV4W71A
געשריבענער/2UOW74AV3D1
געשריען/19A274
געשריענער/A71924
דעקנדיק/2EUONBF7R
דערהרגע/N
דערשטיקנדיק/NER
האַנדלט/BF
וואונקען/1
וואָרט/8
וועבן/2DA3
זשעדנע/S
טעשעלע/C
יאָגן/145F
יונגעריש/ENR
כפלענדיקס/F
לייגנדיקס/W1FAB2UO739468
לייקענענדיקס/OF
מיטלענדיש/REN
מיסטו/B
נייענדיק/2NU3RABFE
נעאָראָמאַנטישע/S
פּאַסן/UA
פאַרשטופּט/ERN
פירנדיק/VEWNR2U31945DF7OA
פירנדיקס/279DW4UO15AV3F
פלאַקערנדיק/UN6ER
פּעטשל/C
פּעקלענדיקס/A5
פערציקיאָריק/RNE
פּראָטאַגאָניסטקע/S
פרעסנדיק/UN7E1R
צואוואַקסן/2U317A4
צואוואַרפן/237O9AW1465D8
צובעטן/721A34
צושיסן/W29D4
צימבלענדיק/NRE
צערעוועט/F
קאַסירנדיקס/3
קומענדיק/W2ERU7N1O465BD9AF8
קלאַפּנדיקס/O1AF2
קלייבן/75U4A
קריגן/F4A
ריכטנדיק/3ERFN2U1O
רעדע/8S
שאָטענען/BF
שווימערעלע/C
שווינדלען/VBF
שטייגנדיקס/O5U736
שטעכן/2FD
שטעלנדיק/WER21NO94ABF8U736
שטעקנדיקס/6F1OB4A
שלאָגן/UD1627O4
שלומדיק/NRE
שמעלער/FN
שנאה/S
